New Jersey, session 222, S4416.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2024, c.100 (C.30:9A-34) is amended to read as follows: 1.  a.  The Department of Children and Families shall distribute a grant in the amount of $1,000,000 to the New Jersey Health Care Quality Institute to assemble a group of stakeholders to: (1)  create a comprehensive visual journey map that outlines families' experiences in obtaining mental health care and related support services for their children; (2)  identify the eligibility rules for various pediatric mental health care programs and resources available to children in this State, steps and barriers to accessing these programs and services, and how these programs and services may connect, disconnect, or compete; and (3)  provide concrete policy suggestions to improve the structure, funding, mission, and interconnectedness of pediatric mental health care programs ensuring that programs are family- and child-focused. b.    The group of stakeholders shall consist of:  representatives with subject matter expertise in pediatric mental health care services; pediatric mental health care providers; and mental health care program administrators from counties representing the northern, central, and southern regions of New Jersey. c.     The New Jersey Health Care Quality Institute shall: (1)   evaluate the current landscape of pediatric mental health care services across: schools; counties; State agencies including, but not limited to, the Departments of Children and Families, Education, Human Services, and Health; insurers; and the legal system; (2)   identify the eligibility rules, covered services, and funding structures for pediatric mental health care programs available to children in this State; (3)   conduct qualitative research through interviews and focus groups with families, health care providers, and program administrators across three counties representing the northern, central, and southern regions of New Jersey; (4)   review the applicable laws, regulations, and contract terms governing pediatric mental health care services in the State; (5)   highlight barriers to care and analyze payment structures, reimbursement rates, and cost-sharing provisions to identify financial barriers to access to pediatric mental health care services; and (6)   compile and analyze data on pediatric mental health outcomes, stratified by payer type, race, ethnicity, and other relevant characteristics that can identify disparities in access to pediatric mental health care services and pediatric mental health outcomes across different populations[; (7)   no later than 13 months after the date of enactment of this act, prepare and submit to the Department of Children and Families a document that visually maps the steps a child and family are required to take in order to access mental health care services, covering the initial contact with a mental health care provider to the provision of mental health care and noting all the interactions, required steps, and encountered barriers related to receiving mental health care; and (8)   no later than 13 months after the date of enactment of this act, prepare and submit to the Department of Children and Families a document that: summarizes eligibility criteria, coverage details, and payment policies for pediatric mental health care programs available to children in the State; identifies any key issues related to pediatric mental health care and any disparities in mental health outcomes in the State; and includes the advisory group's policy recommendations to improve pediatric mental health care program structures, efficiency, coverage, funding, and interconnectedness]. (cf: P.L.2024, c.100, s.1) 2.  (New section)   a.  The New Jersey Health Care Quality Institute shall serve as the designated implementation and coordination entity to support the implementation of the recommendations contained in the Children's Mental Health Mapping Report. b.  In this capacity, the New Jersey Health Care Quality Institute, in coordination with the Department of Human Services and other appropriate State departments and agencies, shall: (1)  facilitate stakeholder engagement, cross-sector collaboration, and convening activities necessary to support implementation of the report recommendations; (2)  provide policy, research, technical assistance, and implementation support to State departments and agencies, as it relates to children's mental health system improvement initiatives; (3)  assist the Department of Human Services and other State departments and agencies in the development, coordination, and dissemination of guidance, best practices, and transition-of-care protocols across levels of care and service systems; (4)  consult with the Department of Human Services regarding the design, implementation, governance, and ongoing use of the Children's Mental Health Data Dashboard established pursuant to section 3 of this act; (5)  monitor the implementation of the Children's Mental Health Mapping Report recommendations, identify barriers and opportunities for improvement, and support coordination among responsible entities; and (6)  prepare and submit periodic implementation progress reports and recommendations to the Department of Human Services. 3.  (New section)  a.  The Department of Human Services, in consultation with the Department of Children and Families, the Department of Health, the Department of Banking and Insurance, the Children's System of Care, managed care organizations, health systems, insurers, providers, and other appropriate entities, shall establish and maintain a publicly accessible Children's Mental Health Data Dashboard. b.  The dashboard shall provide transparent, publicly available information regarding the children's behavioral health system, including, but not limited to, workforce capacity, service availability, utilization, access measures, wait times, quality indicators, and other information deemed appropriate by the Department of Human Services. c.  The Department of Human Services shall consult with the New Jersey Health Care Quality Institute regarding dashboard design, governance, data elements, public reporting methodologies, and opportunities to support the implementation of recommendations contained in the Children's Mental Health Mapping Report. 4.  a.  The Department of Human Services shall enter into a memorandum of understanding or other appropriate agreement with the New Jersey Health Care Quality Institute for a period of three years to effectuate the provisions of this act. b. The memorandum of understanding shall establish implementation activities, deliverables, reporting requirements, performance expectations, timelines, and interdepartmental coordination responsibilities. 5.  a.  There is transferred from funds appropriated to the Department of Children and Families in fiscal year 2027 the sum of $3,000,000 to the Department of Human Services for the purposes of implementing the provisions of this act. b. Of the amount transferred pursuant to subsection a. of this section, $1,500,000 shall be used during the first year following enactment to design, develop, implement, and operationalize the Children's Mental Health Data Dashboard. c. Of the amount transferred pursuant to subsection a. of this section, $1,500,000 shall be distributed over a three-year period to the New Jersey Health Care Quality Institute pursuant to the memorandum of understanding established under section 4 of this act, for implementation coordination, stakeholder engagement, technical assistance, reporting, and other activities necessary to support implementation of the Children's Mental Health Mapping Report recommendations. 6. The Commissioner of Human Services shall apply for such State plan amendments, waivers, and federal regulatory approvals, including an Advanced Planning Document pursuant to 45 C.F.R. Part 95, as may be warranted to further support the implementation of the provisions of this act and to secure the maximum available federal financial participation for technology infrastructure and data use improvements under the Medicaid program. 7.  This act shall take effect immediately, and section 2 through 4 shall expire following the completion of the distribution of funds as required pursuant to section 5 of this act.